Tables/Contraction/de-wort.cti
sufword meer =
always meerkatz =
always meerschwein 134-15-15-1235-156-2456-1246
always adriameer =
always beringmeer 12-12456-35-1245-134-15-15-1235
always blockmeer 12-123-135-46-134-15-15-1235
always betonmeer 23-2345-135-1345-134-15-15-1235
always binnenmeer 12-35-1345-14-134-15-15-1235
always blättermeer 12-123-345-2345-2345-12456-134-15-15-1235
always blumenmeer 12-123-136-134-14-134-15-15-1235
always blütenmeer 12-123-1256-2345-14-134-15-15-1235
always blutmeer =
always bodenmeer 12-135-145-14-134-15-15-1235
always boxmeer =
always bruchmeer 12-1235-136-1456-134-15-15-1235
always datenmeer 145-1-2345-14-134-15-15-1235
always drachenmeer 145-1235-56-14-134-15-15-1235
always dunkelmeer 145-256-13-13456-134-15-15-1235
always eismeer 146-234-134-15-15-1235
always elfenmeer 13456-124-14-134-15-15-1235
always fahnenmeer 124-1-125-1345-14-134-15-15-1235
always farbenmeer 124-356-12-14-134-15-15-1235
always felsenmeer 124-13456-234-14-134-15-15-1235
always felsmeer 124-13456-234-134-15-15-1235
always feuermeer 124-126-12456-134-15-15-1235
always flachmeer 124-123-56-134-15-15-1235
always flaggenmeer 124-123-1-1245-1245-14-134-15-15-1235
always flammenmeer 124-123-1-1346-14-134-15-15-1235
always frauenmeer 124-1235-16-14-134-15-15-1235
always gipfelmeer 1245-24-1234-124-13456-134-15-15-1235
always glasmeer =
always glutmeer =
always hauptmeer 125-1234-134-15-15-1235
always häusermeer 125-34-234-12456-134-15-15-1235
always herbstmeer 125-12456-12-23456-134-15-15-1235
always heimatmeer 125-146-134-1-2345-134-15-15-1235
always inlandsmeer 35-123-235-145-234-134-15-15-1235
always inselmeer 35-234-13456-134-15-15-1235
always jurameer =
always kerzenmeer 13-12456-1356-14-134-15-15-1235
always korallenmeer 13-26-1-12345-14-134-15-15-1235
always kreidemeer 13-1235-146-145-15-134-15-15-1235
always küstenmeer 13-1256-23456-14-134-15-15-1235
always landmeer 123-235-145-134-15-15-1235
always luftmeer =
always marmormeer 134-356-134-26-134-15-15-1235
always menschenmeer 134-14-156-14-134-15-15-1235
always mittelmeer 134-2345-134-15-15-1235
always mondmeer =
always nachtmeer 1345-56-2345-134-15-15-1235
always nebelmeer 1345-15-12-13456-134-15-15-1235
always nebenmeer 1345-12-134-15-15-1235
always nordmeer 1345-26-145-134-15-15-1235
always ostmeer 135-23456-134-15-15-1235
always perlenmeer 1234-12456-123-14-134-15-15-1235
always randmeer 1235-235-145-134-15-15-1235
always regenmeer 1235-15-1245-14-134-15-15-1235
always rosenmeer 1235-135-234-14-134-15-15-1235
always rossmeer 125-135-2346-134-15-15-1235
always salzmeer 234-25-1356-134-15-15-1235
always sahnemeer =
always sandmeer 234-235-145-134-15-15-1235
always schilfmeer 156-24-123-124-134-15-15-1235
always schwarzmeer 156-2456-356-1356-134-15-15-1235
always silbermeer 234-24-123-12-12456-134-15-15-1235
always sprachmeer 234-1234-1235-56-134-15-15-1235
always steinmeer 23456-1246-134-15-15-1235
always strahlenmeer 23456-1235-1-125-123-14-134-15-15-1235
always südmeer =
always teilmeer 2345-146-123-134-15-15-1235
always untermeer 2-256-134-15-15-1235
always urmeer =
always waldmeer 2456-25-145-134-15-15-1235
always wassermeer 2456-1-2346-12456-134-15-15-1235
always wattenmeer 2456-1-2345-2345-14-134-15-15-1235
always weißmeer 2456-146-6-2346-134-15-15-1235
always wellenmeer 2456-15-12345-14-134-15-15-1235
always weltmeer 2456-13456-2345-134-15-15-1235
always westmeer 2456-15-23456-134-15-15-1235
always wolkenmeer 2456-135-123-13-14-134-15-15-1235

prfword beet =
prfword beete 12-15-15-236
prfword beeten 12-15-15-2345-14
prfword beetes 12-15-15-2345-123456
prfword beets 12-15-15-2345-234

begword mengen 134-14-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction

sufword mensa 134-14-234-1 mensagebäude, mensaleitung, mensamitglied

always merkmal 134-12456-13-134

before s always mess 134-15-2346

always meter 134-15-2345-12456
always emeter 15-134-15-2345-12456
always demeter 145-15-134-15-2345-12456

always milieu 134-24-123-24-126 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
prfword mitte 134-24-2345-236
prfword mitten 134-24-2345-2345-14
always mitternacht 134-24-2345-2345-12456-1345-56-2345 shoudln't use the mit-contraction
always mitternächt 134-24-2345-2345-12456-1345-345-1456-2345 shoudln't use the mit-contraction
always mittlung 134-24-2345-2345-123-136 shouldn't use the mit-contraction
prfword moore =
prfword mooren 134-135-135-1235-14
prfword moores 134-135-135-1235-123456
prfword moors =

always mmöbel 134-134-246-12-13456 shouldn't use the mm-contraction

always demuseum =
always emuseum =
always mmuseum =
always demuseen 145-15-134-136-234-15-14
always emuseen 15-134-136-234-15-14
always mmuseen 134-134-136-234-15-14

always nachfolge 1345-56-124-1245-15
prfword nachfolgen 1345-56-124-1245-14
prfword nachfolger 1345-56-124-1245-12456
prfword nachfolgerin 1345-56-124-1245-12456-35
prfword nachfolgerinnen 1345-56-124-1245-12456-35-1345-14
prfword nachfolgern 1345-56-124-1245-12456-1345
prfword nachfolgers 1345-56-124-1245-12456-234
always nachfolgerschaft 1345-56-124-1245-12456-156
always nachwuchs 1345-56-2456-136-1456-234 shouldn't trigger ss- or st-contraction
always nappaleder 1345-1-1234-1234-1-123-15-145-12456
begword national 1345-5-1345-25
always enetz =
begword neuro 1345-126-1235-135
before g always nibelun 1345-24-12-13456-256 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
sufword achtelnoten 1-1456-2345-13456-1345-135-2345-14
midendword achtelnoten 56-2345-13456-1345-135-2345-14
always banknoten 12-235-13-1345-135-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always fußnoten 124-136-6-2346-1345-135-2345-14
always knoten 13-1345-135-2345-14


always olympia =

prfword orgie 26-1245-24-15
prfword orgien 26-1245-24-14

sufword orts 26-2345-234
always ortschaft 26-2345-156
always ortstein 26-2345-23456-1246

always papagei 1234-1-1234-1-1245-146
always paprika =
sufword pastell 1234-1-23456-15-12345 shouldn't use the stell-contraction
always patienten 1234-1-2345-24-14-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
before l always pauschal 1234-16-156-25
always pegel 1234-15-1245-13456
always pestorahm 1234-15-23456-135-1235-1-125-134
begword pferde 1234-124-12456-145-15
always pferderass 1234-124-12456-145-15-1235-1-2346
prfword pferden 1234-124-12456-145-14
always philosoph = shouldn't use the so-contraction
before lnr always pizza =
always ⠏⠇⠁⠞⠑⠁⠥ =
always prall 1234-1235-1-12345 shouldn't use the aller- or allen-contraction
always premier 1234-1235-12356-24-12456
always prestige 1234-1235-15-23456-24-12346
before hilmnrsu always presse 1234-1235-15-2346-15
prfword pressen 1234-1235-15-2346-14
prfword pressend 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145
prfword pressende 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-15
prfword pressendem 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-12356
prfword pressenden 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-14
prfword pressender 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-12456
prfword pressendes 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-123456
always pressendruck 1234-1235-15-2346-14-145-46
prfword pressens 1234-1235-15-2346-14-234
always pressentisch 1234-1235-15-2346-14-2345-24-156
before l begword profil 12345-124-24-123
before l midword profil =
sufword protein 12345-236-35 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
midendword protein 1234-1235-135-236-35 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
sufword raketen 1235-1-13-15-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always rastalock 1235-1-23456-1-123-135-46

before m always arm 356-134
before m always baum 12-16-134
before m always konsum =
before m always raum 1235-16-134
prfword eraum 15-1235-16-134
prfword eraums 15-1235-16-134-234
prfword eraumes 15-1235-16-134-123456
prfword eräume 15-1235-34-134-15
prfword eräumen 15-1235-34-134-14
before m always schirm 156-24-1235-134
before m always strom 23456-1235-135-134
before m always lärm =
before m always vakuum =
before m always darm 145-356-134
before m sufword problem 12345-12-123-12356
before m always problem 1234-1235-135-12-123-12356
before m always symptom =
before m always system 234-6-13456-23456-12356
before m always traum 2345-1235-16-134

before cost always antriebs 235-2345-1235-346-12-234
prfword antriebst 235-2345-1235-346-12-23456
always antriebstation 235-2345-1235-346-12-23456-5-1345
before cost always bambus =
before cost always brems 12-1235-12356-234
prfword bremst 12-1235-12356-23456
prfword bremste 12-1235-12356-23456-15
prfword bremstem 12-1235-12356-23456-12356
prfword bremsten 12-1235-12356-23456-14
prfword bremster 12-1235-12356-23456-12456
prfword bremstes 12-1235-12356-23456-123456
prfword bremstest 12-1235-12356-23456-15-23456
prfword bremstet 12-1235-12356-23456-15-2345
before cost always geschäfts 1245-124-234
before cost always heraus 125-12456-16-234
before cost always kriegs 13-1235-346-1245-234
prfword kriegst 13-1235-346-1245-23456


always rechteinhaber 1235-2345-15-35-2-125-12456 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
always reichstag 1235-146-1456-234-2345-1-1245 shouldn't use the st-contraction
before e always reise 1235-146-234-15
always relief 1235-13456-24-15-124 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
sufword renten 1235-14-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always requiem 1235-15-6-12345-136-24-12356

before hilmnrsu always reserve 1235-123456-12456-1236-15
prfword reserven 1235-123456-12456-1236-14
before t always resulta =

always rhabarber 1235-125-1-12-356-12-12456
always röntgen 1235-246-1345-2345-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword runde 1235-256-145-15
prfword runden 1235-256-145-14
sufword sahne =
always salbei 234-25-12-146
sufword sauf 234-16-124
always saurier 234-16-1235-24-12456
always thesaurier 2345-125-15-234-16-1235-346-1235

always stipendien 23456-24-1234-14-145-24-14

always sample =
prfword samplen 234-1-134-1234-123-14
prfword sampler 234-1-134-1234-123-12456
always samplermodul 234-1-134-1234-123-12456-134-135-145-136-123
prfword samplern 234-1-134-1234-123-12456-1345
prfword samplers 234-1-134-1234-123-12456-234
prfword samples 234-1-134-1234-123-123456

midendword samt =

before hilmnrsu always säure 234-34-1235-15
prfword säuren 234-34-1235-14
before konsonant always säuren 234-34-1235-14

before l always sauna 234-16-1345-1
prfword solos =
prfword soli =
always speise 234-1234-146-234-15
prfword speisen 234-1234-146-234-14
prfword speisend 234-1234-146-234-14-145
prfword speisende 234-1234-146-234-14-145-15
prfword speisendem 234-1234-146-234-14-145-12356
prfword speisenden 234-1234-146-234-14-145-14
prfword speisender 234-1234-146-234-14-145-12456
prfword speisendes 234-1234-146-234-14-145-123456
always schaufel 156-16-124-13456 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always schaufenster 156-16-124-14-23456-12456 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
before l always schul 156-136-123
before l always sschul 234-156-136-123
always scheiben 156-146-12-14
before hilmnrsu always schmiede 156-134-346-145-15
prfword schmieden 156-134-346-145-14
prfword schmiedend 156-134-346-145-14-145
prfword schmiedende 156-134-346-145-14-145-15
prfword schmiedendem 156-134-346-145-14-145-12356
prfword schmiedenden 156-134-346-145-14-145-14
prfword schmiedender 156-134-346-145-14-145-12456
prfword schmiedendes 156-134-346-145-14-145-123456
prfword schmiedens 156-134-346-145-14-234
prfword schmiedes 156-134-346-145-123456

before hilmnrsu always schweine 156-2456-1246-15
prfword schweinen 156-2456-1246-14
prfword schweinerei 156-2456-1246-12456-146
prfword schweinereien 156-2456-1246-12456-146-14
prfword schweines 156-2456-1246-123456
